Utah statutes.
78B-1-130.   Witnesses -- Duty when served with subpoena.

A witness served with a subpoena shall:

(1)  attend at the time appointed with any papers required by the subpoena;

(2)  answer all pertinent and legal questions; and

(3)  unless sooner discharged, remain until the testimony is closed.

